Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.110

Departments of agriculture, fish and wildlife, health, licensing, natural resources—Penalty.

The department of agriculture, fish and wildlife, health, licensing, or natural resources may issue a civil penalty provided for by law without first issuing a notice of correction if: (1) The person has previously been subject to an enforcement action for the same or similar type of violation of the same statute or rule or has been given previous notice of the same or similar type of violation of the same statute or rule; or (2) compliance is not achieved by the date established by the department in a previously issued notice of correction, if the department has responded to any request for review of such date by reaffirming the original date or establishing a new date; [or] (3) the violation has a probability of placing a person in danger of death or bodily harm, has a probability of causing more than minor environmental harm, or has a probability of causing physical damage to the property of another in an amount exceeding one thousand dollars; or (4) the violation was committed by a business that employed fifty or more employees on at least one day in each of the preceding twelve months. In addition, the department of fish and wildlife may issue a civil penalty provided for by law without first issuing a notice of correction for a violation of any rule dealing with seasons, catch or bag limits, gear types, or geographical areas for fish or wildlife removal, reporting, or disposal.

This section does not apply to the civil penalties imposed under *RCW 82.38.170(13).

[ 1998 c 176 s 84; 1995 c 403 s 612.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 82.38.170 was amended by 2013 c 225 s 118, deleting subsection (13), effective July 1, 2016.